Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-116
Banks; capital stock; amount required.

(1) A charter for a bank hereafter organized shall not be issued unless the corporation applying therefor shall have a surplus of not less than seventy thousand dollars or seventy percent of its paid-up capital stock, whichever is greater, and a paid-up capital stock as follows: In villages or counties of less than one thousand inhabitants, one hundred thousand dollars; in cities, villages, or counties of one thousand or more and less than twenty-five thousand inhabitants, not less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars; in cities or counties of twenty-five thousand or more and less than one hundred thousand inhabitants, not less than two hundred thousand dollars; and in cities or counties of one hundred thousand or more inhabitants, not less than five hundred thousand dollars.

(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the department shall have the authority to determine the minimum amount of paid-up capital stock and surplus required for any corporation applying for a bank charter, which amounts shall not be less than the amounts provided in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) For purposes of this section, population shall be determined by the most recent federal decennial census.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 13, p. 72;

R.S.1913, § 292;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 11, p. 689;

Laws 1921, c. 297, § 3, p. 950;

C.S.1922, § 7992;

Laws 1923, c. 192, § 1, p. 463;

C.S.1929, § 8-122;

Laws 1935, c. 19, § 1, p. 95;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-122;

Laws 1943, c. 19, § 3(1), p. 102;

R.S.1943, § 8-119;

Laws 1959, c. 15, § 3, p. 132;

Laws 1961, c. 15, § 1, p. 111;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-119;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 16, p. 140;

Laws 1967, c. 19, § 3, p. 118;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 4;

Laws 1979, LB 220, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 252, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1094, § 3;

Laws 2008, LB851, § 2.